Utah statutes.
22-3-414.   Receipts normally apportioned -- Derivatives and options.
(1)  In this section, "derivative" means a contract or financial instrument or
a combination of contracts and financial instruments which gives a trust the
right or obligation to participate in some or all changes in the price of a
tangible or intangible asset or group of assets, or changes in a rate, an
index of prices or rates, or other market indicator for an asset or a group of
assets.
(2)  To the extent that a trustee does not account under Section 22-3-403 for
transactions in derivatives, the trustee shall allocate to principal receipts
from and disbursements made in connection with those transactions.
(3)  If a trustee grants an option to buy property from the trust, whether or
not the trust owns the property when the option is granted, grants an option
that permits another person to sell property to the trust, or acquires an
option to buy property for the trust or an option to sell an asset owned by
the trust, and the trustee or other owner of the asset is required to deliver
the asset if the option is exercised, an amount received for granting the
option must be allocated to principal.  An amount paid to acquire the option
must be paid from principal.  A gain or loss realized upon the exercise of an
option, including an option granted to a settlor of the trust for services
rendered, must be allocated to principal.
